Massachusetts, session 194th, S1854.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Paragraph (g) of subdivision (2) of section 3 of chapter 32 of the General Laws, is hereby
amended by inserting after line 326 the following new paragraph:-
Any municipality or public authority may elect to improve the retirement group
classification for any group of employees of the municipality or the public authority upon its
acceptance in the following manner: in a city having a Plan D or a Plan E charter by majority
vote of its city council and approved by the manager; in any other city by majority vote of the
city council and approved by the mayor; in a town by vote of the board of selectmen; in a public
authority by majority vote of the authority governing board. Nothing in this act shall be
construed as authorization to diminish the retirement benefits of public employees by placing
any group of employees in a lower group of classification.
of 1